Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-2739
Violation; fine; amount.

The director may assess a fine against a person that violates the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation per day for each day the violation is outstanding, plus the department's and the State of Nebraska's costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 39;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 44.